Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1326
Real property; sale, deed; bill of sale; execution; conditions; disposition of proceeds.

The Director-State Engineer, for the department, and in the name of the State of Nebraska, may execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver all deeds, bills of sale, and other instruments necessary and proper to carry out the sale and exchange of real property. Such deeds, bills of sale, and other instruments shall have affixed thereto the seal of the department. The deeds, bills of sale, and other instruments may contain any conditions, covenants, exceptions, and reservations which the department deems are in the public interest or may convey title in fee simple absolute. All money received from the sale of such property shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 26, p. 429;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 6.